Massachusetts, session 194th, S983.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40H of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 10.
There is hereby established a Massachusetts center for housing cooperatives within the
executive office of housing and livable communities. The Massachusetts center for housing
cooperatives shall provide education, conduct outreach and promote efforts to create an overall
environment in the commonwealth to: (i) expand and enhance cooperative resident ownership;
(ii) preserve the existing and increase the number of cooperatively owned properties; (iii)
publicize and promote the benefits of resident cooperative housing to policy makers and the
general public; (iv) encourage collaborative outreach efforts regarding involvement and
of 3

cooperative housing ownership; (v) research and evaluate cooperative housing ownership in the
commonwealth; (vi) showcase cooperative housing initiatives in the commonwealth; (vii)
facilitate and coordinate the sharing of existing information and resources; and (viii) provide
grants pursuant to this chapter. The Massachusetts center for housing cooperatives within the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall focus its efforts to promote housing
cooperatives for low to moderate income people in the commonwealth.
(1) The director of the Massachusetts center for housing cooperatives shall have the
power to hire staff, appoint any specific committee or task force and contract with consultants,
agents or advisors deemed necessary to further the purposes of this section.
(2) The director may accept gifts or grants of money or property from any source to
further the work of the center; provided, however, that any money received shall be deposited
with the state treasurer to be kept in a separate fund in the treasury to be named the
Massachusetts Center for Housing Cooperatives Fund dedicated to the center and for expenditure
without appropriation by the director of the center in accordance with the conditions of such a
gift or grant. Amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the
General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.
(3) The director shall issue rules, regulations and procedures governing the application
for and delivery of services which are deemed necessary for the proper performance of the duties
of the center.
(4) Annually, the director shall file a report with the clerks of the house of representatives
and senate, including an inventory of housing cooperatives in the state and the specific activities
of 3

taken by the center to support and promote the transition of traditionally structured properties to
a cooperative resident ownership model.
(5) The director shall be a full-time employee of the executive office of housing and
livable communities and shall be appointed by and report directly to the the secretary of the
executive office of housing and livable communities.
SECTION 2. The commonwealth shall appropriate $100,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 for a
reserve to promote housing cooperatives throughout the commonwealth for low to moderate
income people, including, but not limited to acquiring real estate to establish housing
cooperatives, preserving, rehabilitating and satisfying the capital needs of existing cooperatives
through programs administered by the department of housing and community development
directly or through 1 or more of the following: (i) Massachusetts Housing Finance Agency; (ii)
Massachusetts Housing Partnership; (iii) Community Economic Development Assistance
Corporation; and (iv) ROC USA Capital provided further, that within 180 days of the effective
date of this Act, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies on
recommendations for creating and preserving housing cooperatives throughout the
commonwealth.
of 3